Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1435
Nonministerial, defined.

Nonministerial shall mean an action other than an action which a person performs in a prescribed manner under prescribed circumstances in obedience to the mandate of legal authority, without the exercise of personal judgment regarding whether to take the action.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 35.